Utah statutes.
59-1-501.   Procedure for obtaining redetermination of a deficiency -- Claim for refund.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Legal holiday" is as defined in Section 59-10-518.

(b)  "Tax, fee, or charge" is as defined in Section 59-1-1402.

(2)  A person may file a request for agency action, petitioning the commission for redetermination of a deficiency.

(3)  Subject to Subsections (4) through (6), a person shall file the request for agency action described in Subsection (2):

(a)  within a 30-day period after the date the commission mails a notice of deficiency to the person in accordance with Section 59-1-1405; or

(b)  within a 90-day period after the date the commission mails a notice of deficiency to the person in accordance with Section 59-1-1405 if the notice of deficiency is addressed to a person outside the United States or the District of Columbia.

(4)  If the last day of a time period described in Subsection (3) is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the last day for a person to file a request for agency action is the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

(5)  A person that mails a request for agency action shall mail the request for agency action in accordance with Section 59-1-1404.

(6)  For purposes of Subsection (3), a person is considered to have filed a request for agency action:

(a)  if the person mails the request for agency action, on the date the person is considered to have mailed the request for agency action in accordance with Section 59-1-1404; or

(b)  if the person delivers the request for agency action to the commission by a method other than mail, on the date the commission receives the request for agency action.

(7)  A person who has not previously filed a timely request for agency action in accordance with Subsection (3) may object to a final assessment issued by the commission by:

(a)  paying the tax, fee, or charge; and

(b)  filing a claim for a refund as provided in Section 59-1-1410.



Amended by Chapter 212, 2009 General Session

